Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB230.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 7 of this Act, unless context requires otherwise:
(1) "Ancillary service" means a facility item or service that a facility customarily
provides as part of a shoppable service;
(2) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(3) "Chargemaster" means the list of all facility items or services maintained by a
facility for which the facility has established a charge;
(4) "De-identified maximum negotiated charge" means the highest charge that a
facility has negotiated with all third-party payors for a facility item or service;
(5) "De-identified minimum negotiated charge" means the lowest charge that a
facility has negotiated with all third-party payors for a facility item or service;
(6) "Discounted cash price" means the charge that applies to an individual who pays
cash, or a cash equivalent, for a facility item or service;
(7) "Facility" means a hospital licensed under this chapter;
(8) "Facility items or services" means all items and services, including individual
items and services and service packages, that may be provided by a facility to a
patient in connection with an inpatient admission or an outpatient department
visit, as applicable, for which the facility has established a standard charge,
including:
(a) Supplies and procedures;
(b) Room and board;
(c) Use of the facility and other areas, the charges for which are generally
referred to as facility fees;
(d) Services of physicians and nonphysician practitioners employed by the
Page 1 of 16
XXXX 12/3/2025 11:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 163
facility, the charges for which are generally referred to as professional
charges; and
(e) Any other item or service for which a facility has established a standard
charge;
(9) "Gross charge" means the charge for a facility item or service that is reflected on
a facility’s chargemaster, absent any discounts;
(10) "Machine-readable format" means a digital representation of information in a
file that can be imported or read into a computer system for further processing,
and includes .XML, .JSON, and .CSV formats;
(11) "Payor-specific negotiated charge" means the charge that a facility has
negotiated with a third-party payor for a facility item or service;
(12) "Service package" means an aggregation of individual facility items or services
into a single service with a single charge;
(13) "Shoppable service" means a service that may be scheduled by a health care
consumer in advance;
(14) "Standard charge" means the regular rate established by the facility for a facility
item or service provided to a specific group of paying patients, and includes all of
the following as defined in this section:
(a) The gross charge;
(b) The payor-specific negotiated charge;
(c) The de-identified minimum negotiated charge;
(d) The de-identified maximum negotiated charge; and
(e) The discounted cash price; and
(15) "Third-party payor" means an entity or government program that provides
coverage for health care services that are furnished to the entity's or program's
insureds or beneficiaries.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
Page 2 of 16
XXXX 12/3/2025 11:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 163
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a facility shall make public a:
(1) Digital file in a machine-readable format that contains a list of all standard
charges, expressed in dollar amounts, for all facility items or services as described
in Section 3 of this Act; and
(2) Consumer-friendly list of standard charges, expressed in dollar amounts, for a
limited set of shoppable services as provided in Section 4 of this Act.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A facility shall maintain a chargemaster of all standard charges, expressed in
dollar amounts, for all facility items or services in accordance with this section.
(2) The standard charges contained in the chargemaster shall reflect the standard
charges, expressed in dollar amounts, applicable to that location of the facility,
regardless of whether the facility operates in more than one (1) location or
operates under the same license as another facility.
(3) The chargemaster shall include the following items, as applicable:
(a) A description of each facility item or service provided by the facility;
(b) The following standard charges, expressed in dollar amounts, for each
individual facility item or service when provided in either an inpatient
setting or an outpatient department setting, as applicable:
1. The gross charge;
2. The de-identified minimum negotiated charge;
3. The de-identified maximum negotiated charge;
4. The discounted cash price; and
5. The payor-specific negotiated charge, listed by the name of the third-
party payor and plan associated with the charge and displayed in a
manner that clearly associates the charge with each third-party payor
Page 3 of 16
XXXX 12/3/2025 11:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 163
and plan; and
(c) Any code used by the facility for purposes of accounting or billing for the
facility item or service, including the Current Procedural Terminology
(CPT) code, Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System (HCPCS) code,
Diagnosis Related Group (DRG) code, National Drug Code (NDC), or other
common identifier.
(4) The information contained in the chargemaster shall be published in a single
digital file that is in a machine-readable format.
(5) The chargemaster required under subsection (1) of this section shall be displayed
in a prominent location on the home page of the facility’s publicly accessible
website or accessible by selecting a dedicated link that is prominently displayed on
the home page of the facility’s publicly accessible website. If the facility operates
multiple locations and maintains a single website, the chargemaster required
under subsection (1) of this section shall be posted for each location the facility
operates in a manner that clearly associates the chargemaster with the applicable
location of the facility.
(6) The chargemaster required under subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) Be available:
1. Free of charge;
2. Without having to register or establish a user account or password;
3. Without having to submit personal identifying information; and
4. Without having to overcome any other impediment, including entering
a code to access the list;
(b) Be accessible to a common commercial operator of an internet search
engine to the extent necessary for the search engine to index the list and
display the list as a result in response to a search query of a user of the
search engine;
Page 4 of 16
XXXX 12/3/2025 11:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 163
(c) Be formatted in a manner prescribed by the cabinet;
(d) Be digitally searchable; and
(e) Use the naming convention specified by the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services on its website.
(7) The facility shall update the chargemaster at least one (1) time each year. The
facility shall clearly indicate the date on which the list was most recently updated,
either on the chargemaster or in a manner that is clearly associated with the
chargemaster.
(8) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to establish a template for each facility to use to create the
chargemaster. The cabinet shall:
(a) Consider any applicable federal guidelines for formatting similar
chargemasters required by federal law or rule and ensure that the design of
the template enables health care researchers to compare the charges
contained in the chargemasters maintained by each facility; and
(b) Design the template to be substantially similar to the wide-format .CSV
template used by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for
purposes similar to those of this section.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) A facility shall maintain and make publicly available a chargemaster of the
standard charges described by subsection (3)(b) of Section 3 of this Act for
each of at least three hundred (300) shoppable services provided by the
facility. The facility may select the shoppable services to be included in the
chargemaster, except that the chargemaster shall include:
1. The services specified as shoppable services by the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services; or
Page 5 of 16
XXXX 12/3/2025 11:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 163
2. If the facility does not provide all the shoppable services described by
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, as many of those shoppable
services as the facility does provide.
(b) If a facility does not provide three hundred (300) shoppable services, the
facility shall maintain a chargemaster of the total number of shoppable
services that the facility provides in a manner that otherwise complies with
the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) In selecting a shoppable service for purposes of inclusion in the chargemaster
required under subsection (1) of this section, a facility shall:
(a) Consider how frequently the facility provides the service and the facility’s
billing rate for that service; and
(b) Prioritize the selection of services that are among the services most
frequently provided by the facility.
(3) The chargemaster required under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Shall include:
1. A plain-language description of each shoppable service included;
2. The payor-specific negotiated charge, expressed in a dollar amount,
that applies to each shoppable service included and any ancillary
service, listed by the name of the third-party payor and plan associated
with the charge and displayed in a manner that clearly associates the
charge with the third-party payor and plan;
3. The discounted cash price, expressed in a dollar amount, that applies
to each shoppable service included and any ancillary service or, if the
facility does not offer a discounted cash price for one (1) or more of
the shoppable or ancillary services, the gross charge for the shoppable
service or ancillary service, as applicable;
4. The de-identified minimum negotiated charge, expressed in a dollar
Page 6 of 16
XXXX 12/3/2025 11:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 163
amount, that applies to each shoppable service included and any
ancillary service;
5. The de-identified maximum negotiated charge, expressed in a dollar
amount, that applies to each shoppable service included and any
ancillary service; and
6. Any code used by the facility for purposes of accounting or billing for
each shoppable service included and any ancillary service, including
the CPT, HCPCS, DRG, or NDC code, or other common identifier;
(b) If applicable, shall:
1. State each location at which the facility provides the shoppable service
and whether the standard charges included apply at that location to
the provision of that shoppable service in an inpatient setting, an
outpatient department setting, or both of those settings, as applicable;
and
2. Indicate if one (1) or more of the shoppable services specified by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services is not provided by the
facility; and
(c) As applicable, shall be:
1. Displayed in the manner prescribed in subsection (5) of Section 3 of
this Act, for the chargemaster required under that section;
2. Available:
a. Free of charge;
b. Without having to register or establish a user account or
password;
c. Without having to submit personal identifying information; and
d. Without having to overcome any other impediment, including
entering a code to access the chargemaster;
Page 7 of 16
XXXX 12/3/2025 11:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 163
3. Searchable by service description, billing code, and payor;
4. Updated in the manner prescribed in Section 3 of this Act for the
chargemaster required under that section;
5. Accessible to a common commercial operator of an internet search
engine to the extent necessary for the search engine to index the list
and display the chargemaster as a result in response to a search query
of a user of the search engine; and
6. Formatted in a manner that is consistent with the format prescribed by
the cabinet in Section 3 of this Act.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The cabinet shall monitor each facility's compliance with the requirements of
Sections 2, 3, and 4 of this Act using any of the following methods:
(a) Evaluating complaints made by persons to the cabinet regarding
noncompliance;
(b) Reviewing any analysis prepared regarding noncompliance; and
(c) Auditing the websites of facilities for compliance with this section.
(2) If the cabinet determines that a facility is not in compliance with a provision of
Section 2, 3, or 4 of this Act the cabinet shall take the following actions:
(a) Provide a written notice to the facility that clearly explains the manner in
which the facility is not in compliance;
(b) Request a corrective action plan from the facility if the facility has
materially violated a provision of Section 2, 3, or 4 of this Act; and
(c) Impose an administrative penalty, as determined under Section 7 of this Act,
on the facility and publicize the penalty on the cabinet's internet website if
the facility fails to:
1. Respond to the cabinet's request to submit a corrective action plan; or
Page 8 of 16
XXXX 12/3/2025 11:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 163
2. Comply with the requirements of a corrective action plan submitted to
the cabinet.
(3) Beginning no later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of this Act, the
cabinet shall create and maintain a publicly available list on its website of
hospitals that have been found to have violated Section 2, 3, or 4 of this Act, or
that have been issued an administrative penalty or sent a warning notice, a
request for a corrective action plan, or any other written communication from the
cabinet related to the requirements of Section 2, 3, or 4 of this Act. Such
penalties, notices, and communications shall be subject to public disclosure
under 5 U.S.C. sec. 552, notwithstanding any exemptions or exclusions to the
contrary, in full without redaction. This list shall be updated at least every thirty
(30) days thereafter.
(4) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in considering an
application for renewal of a hospital’s license or certification, the cabinet shall
consider whether the hospital is or has been in compliance with Section 2, 3, or 4
of this Act.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A facility materially violates Section 2, 3, or 4 of this Act if the facility fails to:
(a) Comply with the requirements; or
(b) Publicize the facility's standard charges in the form and manner required.
(2) If the cabinet determines that a facility has materially violated Section 2, 3, or 4
of this Act, the cabinet shall issue a notice of material violation to the facility and
request that the facility submit a corrective action plan. The notice shall indicate
the form and manner by which the corrective action plan shall be submitted to
the cabinet, and clearly state the date by which the facility shall submit the plan.
(3) A facility that receives a notice under subsection (2) of this section shall:
Page 9 of 16
XXXX 12/3/2025 11:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 163
(a) Submit a corrective action plan in the form and manner and by the specified
date prescribed by the notice of violation; and
(b) As soon as practicable after submission of a corrective action plan to the
cabinet, comply with the plan.
(4) A corrective action plan submitted to the cabinet shall:
(a) Describe in detail the corrective action the facility will take to address any
violation identified by the cabinet in the notice provided under subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) Provide a date by which the facility will complete the corrective action.
(5) A corrective action plan shall be subject to review and approval by the cabinet.
After the cabinet reviews and approves a facility’s corrective action plan, the
cabinet shall monitor and evaluate the facility’s compliance with the plan.
(6) A facility is considered to have failed to respond to the cabinet's request to submit
a corrective action plan if the facility fails to submit a corrective action plan:
(a) In the form and manner specified in the notice provided; or
(b) By the date specified in the notice provided under subsection (2) of this
section.
(7) A facility is considered to have failed to comply with a corrective action plan if
the facility fails to address a violation within the specified period of time
contained in the plan.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The cabinet shall impose an administrative penalty on a facility if the facility fails
to:
(a) Respond to the cabinet's request to submit a corrective action plan; or
(b) Comply with the requirements of a corrective action plan submitted to the
cabinet.
Page 10 of 16
XXXX 12/3/2025 11:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 163
(2) The cabinet shall impose an administrative penalty on a facility for a violation of
each requirement of Sections 1 to 7 of this Act. The cabinet shall set the penalty
in an amount sufficient to ensure compliance by a facility with the provisions of
Sections 2, 3, and 4 of this Act subject to the limitations in subsection (3) of this
section.
(3) The penalty imposed by the cabinet shall not be lower than:
(a) In the case of a hospital with a bed count of thirty (30) or fewer, six
hundred dollars ($600) for each day in which the hospital fails to comply
with the requirements;
(b) In the case of a hospital with a bed count that is greater than thirty (30) and
equal to or fewer than five hundred fifty (550), twenty dollars ($20) per bed
for each day in which the hospital fails to comply with the requirements; or
(c) In the case of a hospital with a bed count that is greater than five hundred
fifty (550), eleven thousand dollars ($11,000) for each day in which the
hospital fails to comply with the requirements.
(4) Each day a violation continues shall be considered a separate violation.
(5) In determining the amount of the penalty, the cabinet shall consider:
(a) Previous violations by the facility's operator;
(b) The seriousness of the violation;
(c) The demonstrated good faith of the facility's operator; and
(d) Any other matters the cabinet finds appropriate.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Emergency medical condition" means:
1. A medical condition manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient
severity, including severe pain, that a prudent layperson would
Page 11 of 16
XXXX 12/3/2025 11:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 163
reasonably have cause to believe constitutes a condition that the
absence of immediate medical attention could reasonably be expected
to result in:
a. Placing the health of the individual or, with respect to a
pregnant woman, the health of the woman or her unborn child,
in serious jeopardy;
b. Serious impairment to bodily functions; or
c. Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part; or
2. With respect to a pregnant woman who is having contractions:
a. A situation in which there is inadequate time to effect a safe
transfer to another hospital before delivery; or
b. A situation in which transfer may pose a threat to the health or
safety of the woman or the unborn child;
(b) "Health care provider":
1. Means any person who:
a. Provides health care services to a patient; and
b. Is required to be licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized
under the laws of this state to provide the health care services;
and
2. Includes a health facility as defined in KRS 216B.015;
(c) "Health care service":
1. Means any health care-related treatment, procedure, screening, test,
or other service provided by a health care provider; and
2. Includes the provision of prescription drugs, as defined in KRS
315.010, and home medical equipment, as defined in KRS 309.402;
(d) "Third-party payor" means an entity or government program that provides
coverage for health care services that are furnished to the entity's or
Page 12 of 16
XXXX 12/3/2025 11:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 163
program's insureds or beneficiaries; and
(e) "Written pricing sheet" means a written statement from a health care
provider to a patient, or if applicable, the patient's authorized
representative, that:
1. States:
a. The following for any health care service that the health care
provider will or may provide to the patient:
i. A description of each health care service; and
ii. The total amount that the health care provider will seek in
payment for each health care service; and
b. Of the total amount referenced in subdivision a.ii. of this
subparagraph:
i. The portion of the amount that the health care provider
will seek in payment from, or anticipates will be paid by, a
third-party payor; and
ii. The portion of the amount that the health care provider is
seeking, or anticipates seeking, from the patient; and
2. Includes the following, under the conspicuous caption
"ACKNOWLEDGMENT OF PATIENT" after the statements
referenced in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph:
"I, [enter name of patient and if applicable, indicate the name of any
authorized representative acting on the patient's behalf], hereby
acknowledge by my signature on the line below that I: 1. Have
received a copy of this written pricing sheet; and 2. To the extent
consistent with state and federal law, and any hold harmless
agreements or other payor-specific contractual rights to which I am a
beneficiary, accept the charges for each health care service set forth in
Page 13 of 16
XXXX 12/3/2025 11:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 163
this written pricing sheet.
(Signature line)
(Printed name of patient and if applicable, the printed name of any
authorized representative acting on the patient's behalf)
(Date)".
(2) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a health care provider shall,
to the extent permitted under federal law, do the following prior to providing any
health care service to a patient:
(a) Provide the patient, or if applicable, the patient's authorized representative,
a written pricing sheet; and
(b) Obtain the patient's signature, or if applicable, the signature of the patient's
authorized representative acting on the patient's behalf, on the written
pricing sheet provided to the patient or the patient's authorized
representative.
(3) (a) For any health care service that was provided to a patient in violation of
subsection (2) of this section, a health care provider shall, to the extent
permitted under federal law:
1. Not bill or otherwise receive reimbursement directly from the patient
or the patient's authorized representative for the health care service;
and
2. Have the right to bill, or otherwise seek reimbursement from, the
patient's third-party payor for the health care service.
(b) This subsection shall not be construed to require a third-party payor to pay
or reimburse a health care provider more than what the third-party payor
would otherwise be legally responsible to pay or reimburse.
(4) Nothing in this section waives:
(a) A third-party payor's legal responsibility to pay or reimburse a health care
Page 14 of 16
XXXX 12/3/2025 11:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 163
provider for a health care service that was provided to a patient, regardless
of whether that health care service was provided in violation of subsection
(2) this section; or
(b) A patient's rights:
1. Under any state or federal law that regulates the maximum amount
that a health care provider is entitled to bill or receive for a health
care service; or
2. As a beneficiary under a hold harmless agreement or other contract
with a third-party payor.
(5) (a) To the extent permitted under federal law, a third-party payor shall not, by
contract or otherwise, deny or reduce payment or reimbursement to a health
care provider for any health care service that is provided to a patient solely
because the health care service was provided to the patient in violation of
subsection (2) of this section.
(b) Any contract provision that violates this subsection shall be void and
unenforceable.
(6) This section shall not apply to a health care service that is provided to screen,
treat, or stabilize, or facilitate the screening, treatment, or stabilization of, an
emergency medical condition.
(7) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to establish a template for the written pricing sheet for use by health
care providers and any other requirements it deems necessary for implementing
this section.
Section 9. If the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or the Department for
Medicaid Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form of
authorization or approval from any federal agency to implement Section 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7,
or 8 of this Act is necessary to prevent the loss of federal funds or to comply with federal
Page 15 of 16
XXXX 12/3/2025 11:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 163
law, the cabinet or department:
(1) Shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this section, request the
necessary federal authorization or approval to implement Section 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, or 8 of
this Act; and
(2) May only delay implementation of the provisions of Section 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7,
or 8 of this Act for which federal authorization or approval was deemed necessary until
the federal authorization or approval is granted.
Section 10. Sections 1 to 9 of this Act shall constitute the specific authorization
required under KRS 205.5372(1).
Page 16 of 16
XXXX 12/3/2025 11:12 AM Jacketed